North Carolina statutes. Chapter 6. Liability for Court Costs.
Article 4. Costs on Appeal.

§ 6-33.
Costs on appeal generally.

On appeal from a magistrate or any court of the General Court of Justice, if the appellant recovers judgment, he shall recover the costs of the appeal and also those costs he ought to have recovered below had the judgment of that court been correct. If in any court of appeal there is judgment for a new trial, or for a new jury, or if the judgment appealed from is not wholly reversed, but partly affirmed and partly disaffirmed, the costs shall be in the discretion of the appellate court.

History.

Code, s. 540; Rev., s. 1279; C.S., s. 1256; 1969, c. 44, s. 19; 1971, c. 269, s. 7.

§§ 6-34,
6-35.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1971, c. 269, s. 15.